Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 5. Special Permits

§ 12-4-501.
Malt beverage permit for University of Wyoming; fee; rules and regulations.

Upon an application to the city of Laramie for a malt beverage permit, the city shall issue a special malt beverage permit to the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming for sale of malt beverages drawn only from kegs at the student union on the campus of the University of Wyoming. The issuance of a malt beverage permit shall not be considered an alcoholic beverage permit issued on the basis of population as provided in W.S.

12-4-201

.

The fee for the permit provided by subsection (a) of this section is one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming shall provide rules and regulations for the following:

Locations in which malt beverages may be sold;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 63, § 2.

The hours and days of the operation of the licensed building, which shall be within the following limits:

Monday through Thursday, 3:00 p.m. to 10:00 p.m.;

Friday, 3:00 p.m. to 12:00 midnight;

Saturday, 10:00 a.m. to 12:00 midnight.

Whether food may be sold in the licensed building;

A uniform procedure of age identification for all purchasers;

Locations within the student union where malt beverages may be consumed; and

Such other rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 105, § 2.

The board of trustees may prohibit dispensing malt beverages by any seller designated under paragraph (c)(iv) of this section, for any period less than ninety (90) days, upon information that violations of state law have occurred.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 128, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-6.2; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-103; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2001, ch. 105, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 63, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, §
1, effective July 1, 2017,
in (c)(i), substituted “Locations” for “Location
of the dispensing rooms”; and substituted “licensed
building” for “dispensing rooms” in (c)(iii)
and (c)(iv).

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 63, §
2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (c)(ii) which read: “Furnishings and other features of the dispensing rooms.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 12-4-502.
Twenty-four hour malt beverage permit and catering permit; restrictions; application procedure; fees.

A malt beverage permit authorizing the sale of malt beverages only may be issued by the appropriate licensing authority to any responsible person or organization for sales at a picnic, bazaar, fair, rodeo, special holiday or similar public gathering. No person or organization holding the special permit shall sell any alcoholic liquor other than malt beverages on the premises described on the permit, nor shall any malt beverage be sold or consumed off the premises authorized by the permit. Malt beverage permits under this subsection shall not be used to operate a continuing business.

A catering permit authorizing the sale of alcoholic and malt beverages may be issued by the appropriate licensing authority to any person holding a retail or resort retail liquor license authorizing the off-premises sale of both alcoholic and malt beverages, for sales at events not capable of being held within the licensee’s licensed premises. No licensee holding a catering permit shall sell or permit consumption of any alcoholic or malt beverage off the premises described in the permit. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, closed-container items sold at auction for the benefit of a nonprofit organization may be taken off-premises. Catering permits under this subsection shall not be used to operate a continuing business.

The permits authorized by this section shall be issued for one (1) twenty-four (24) hour period, subject to the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

. No person or organization shall receive more than a total of twelve (12) malt beverage and thirty-six (36) catering permits for sales at the same premises in any one (1) year.

The malt beverage permit and the catering permit shall be issued on application to the appropriate licensing authority without public notice or hearing. An application for a malt beverage permit or catering permit under this section shall be accompanied by a designation of the event for which the application is sought specifying the type of event and the name of the sponsor. Any applicant applying for a permit authorized by this section and having licensed premises located within a jurisdiction other than that jurisdiction to which application is made, shall secure the written approval of the licensing authority of that jurisdiction in which the licensed premises are located prior to filing an application for a permit.

The fee for the malt beverage permit and the catering permit shall be not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per twenty-four (24) hour period, payable to the appropriate licensing authority.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 27; C.S. 1945, § 53-227; W.S. 1957, § 12-27; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-129; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1987, ch. 54, § 1; 1995, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 66, § 1; 1999, ch. 2, § 1; 2001, ch. 57, § 1; 2005, ch. 180, § 1; 2015 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 53, § 1, effective March 4, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (c), inserted “twenty-four (24)” before “catering permits”; and in (d), inserted second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), added “or to catering permits for events at the facilities of the University of Wyoming in Laramie, including the Marian H. Rochelle Gateway Center” at the end, and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment,

substituted “thirty-six (36)” for “twenty-four (24)” in the second sentence of (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 53 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “set pursuant to
W.S.

12-5-101

” for “provided in
W.S.

12-5-101

.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of (a), deleted “W.S.

12-5-201

does not apply to this subsection.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (e), substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00).”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in (a); in the first sentence of (b), substituted "events" for "meetings, conventions, private parties and dinners or at other similar gatherings" preceding "not capable" and added the last sentence; and deleted "., except that this limitation shall not be applicable to malt beverage permits issued for sales at any fair, rodeo, pari-mutuel event or other similar public event conducted by a public entity upon public premises, or to catering permits for events at the facilities of the University of Wyoming in Laramie, including the Marian H. Rochelle Gateway Center" at the end of the second sentence of (c).

§ 12-4-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 28, related to purchases by hospitals, religious organizations, physicians and dentists.

§ 12-4-504.
Special malt beverage permit for public auditoriums, civic centers or events centers.

The appropriate licensing authority in a county, city or town may issue a special malt beverage permit to any responsible person or organization for sales of malt beverages at public auditoriums, civic centers or events centers. The licensing authority shall establish an appropriate fee for the permit. Additionally, the licensing authority shall specify the duration of the permit and where malt beverages may be sold and consumed under the permit. The issuing body may provide rules to implement this section.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 50, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 50, § 2; Laws 2017, ch. 63, § 2.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; 2017 ch. 50, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendments.—

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “The issuing body may provide rules to implement” for “meeting the qualifications of subsection (b) of”, and made a related change.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch 50, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted former (b) through (e) related to qualifications for obtaining the malt beverage permit.

The third
2017 amendment, by ch 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (e) which formerly instructed the issuing body to provide rules and regulations regarding dispensing rooms.

While no amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the second and third sentences in (a).

§ 12-4-505.
Malt beverage permit for annual state fair.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 63, § 2.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 244, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2017 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (c), which formerly instructed the department of agriculture to promulgate rules and regulations regarding dispensing rooms.

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, in (a), in the first and last sentences, substituted “state fair board” for “director of the department of agriculture,” and, in the last sentence, inserted “under this permit” following “consumption” and “during the annual state fair” following “on the state fairgrounds.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a), which read, "Upon application, the appropriate licensing authority shall issue to the state fair board a malt beverage permit for the sale of malt beverages only on the state fairgrounds during the annual state fair. W.S.

12-5-201

does not apply to this subsection. The issuance of a malt beverage permit under this subsection shall not be considered an alcoholic beverage permit issued on the basis of population as provided in W.S.

12-4-201

. Malt beverages shall only be sold for consumption under this permit on the state fairgrounds during the annual state fair in areas specifically designated by the state fair board"; and repealed (b), which read, "The fee for the permit provided by subsection (a) of this section is one hundred dollars ($100.00)."

§ 12-4-506.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 109, § 1, provided for a special event liquor permit for Wyoming territorial prison state park and historical site.

Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

§ 12-4-507.
Malt beverage permit for events conducted at rodeo arenas.

Upon application and upon submission of a reasonable malt beverage sales and control plan mutually agreeable to the applicant and the licensing authority, the appropriate licensing authority shall issue a special malt beverage permit for the sale of malt beverages only at events conducted on the grounds of an indoor or outdoor rodeo with a total seating capacity of over seven thousand five hundred (7,500). The permit may be issued without public notice or hearing. An application for a permit under this section shall be accompanied by a designation of the event for which the application is sought specifying the type of event and the name of the sponsor. The malt beverages shall be served only on grounds contiguous or immediately adjacent to the arena in areas specifically designated by the permittee and approved by the licensing authority. Contiguous or adjacent grounds shall be fenced or otherwise enclosed as approved by the licensing authority. The issuance of a malt beverage permit under this subsection shall not be considered an alcoholic beverage permit issued on the basis of population as provided in W.S.

12-4-201

. Malt beverages shall only be sold for consumption under a permit issued under this section during the dates of an event. W.S.

12-5-201

shall not apply to this section.

The fee for a permit issued under subsection (a) of this section shall be established by rule of the licensing authority but shall not exceed two (2) times the maximum fee provided for twenty-four (24) hour permits under W.S. 12-4-502(e) for each day of the event.

A licensing authority may adopt rules to implement this section provided:

Permit fees may be graduated based upon expected attendance at the event;

No permittee shall be assessed any additional fee by a licensing authority for the issuance of a special malt beverage permit under this section. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a licensing authority from:

Negotiating with a permittee for the voluntary payment of costs incurred by the licensing authority related to the permitted event; or

Recouping costs incurred by the licensing authority related to the permitted event to which the licensing authority is otherwise entitled under Wyoming law.

History.

2020 ch. 161, § 1, effective March 26, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 161, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 26, 2020.